Tennessee, session 114, SB2642.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-101-513(g)(1), is amended by
deleting the last sentence and substituting:
Within seventy-two (72) hours after a modification or change in the information or
documentation required, the secretary of state must be notified in writing of the changes.
Notice may be sent to the secretary of state by mail or email;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2642
012045
- 1 -